Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-123
Right of eminent domain in others; preserved.

Sections 46-119 to 46-122 shall not be construed to deprive any person, persons, company or corporation entitled thereto, to exercise the right of eminent domain.

Laws 1909, c. 156, § 1, p. 566;

Laws 1911, c. 158, § 1, p. 526;

R.S.1913, § 3465;

Laws 1915, c. 69, § 2, p. 173;

Laws 1917, c. 82, § 1, p. 195;

C.S.1922, § 2865;

Laws 1923, c. 97, § 2, p. 248;

Laws 1927, c. 142, § 1, p. 386;

C.S.1929, § 46-109;

R.S.1943, § 46-123.

For eminent domain proceedings, see sections 76-701 to 76-724.